District of Columbia statutes.
11-1301

Continuation of Branch.

The Small Claims and Conciliation Branch shall continue as a branch of the Civil Division in the Superior Court.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 489, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
1981 Ed., § 11-1301.
1973 Ed., § 11-1301.